Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5492.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8. (1) This act may be cited as the "regulating automatic license plate readers act". (2) Definitions in the regulating governmental entities' use of automatic license plate readers act apply for purposes of this act. Sec. 9. (1) An operator of an automatic license plate reader system, on receiving a preservation request from a governmental entity or a defendant in a criminal case, shall take all necessary steps to preserve captured plate data in the operator's possession for not less than 14 days after the preservation request is received. (2) A preservation request described in subsection (1) must contain a written sworn statement describing both of the following: (a) Each camera for which captured plate data must be preserved or the license plate number for which captured plate data must be preserved. (b) The date and time for which captured plate data must be preserved. (3) A governmental entity or defendant in a criminal case may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to order the operator of an automatic license plate reader system to disclose captured plate data. The court shall order the disclosure of captured plate data if presented with facts showing reasonable grounds to believe the captured plate data are relevant and material to an ongoing criminal or missing persons investigation or a criminal prosecution or defense. (4) Captured plate data preserved under subsection (1) must be destroyed if the application for an order under subsection (3) is denied or 14 days after the preservation request is received, whichever is later. (5) A governmental entity may obtain, receive, or use privately held captured plate data only pursuant to a warrant or under subsection (1) and only if the private automatic license plate reader system retains captured plate data for 14 days or less. Sec. 11. Captured plate data and evidence derived from captured plate data may not be used as evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding before any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority of this state or a political subdivision of this state if the disclosure of that captured plate data would violate this act. Sec. 13. A person aggrieved by a violation of this act may bring an action against the person that violated this act to recover both of the following: (a) Actual damages, including all economic or noneconomic damages, or $1,000.00, whichever is greater. (b) Reasonable attorney fees and court costs. Sec. 15. (1) Captured plate data are not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and may be disclosed only to the registered owner of the vehicle the captured plate data are associated with or with the registered owner's prior written consent. (2) Following the presentation to an appropriate governmental entity that maintains, operates, manages, or controls an automatic license plate reader system of a valid, outstanding protection order protecting the driver of a vehicle jointly registered with or registered solely in the name of the individual on whose behalf the protection order was issued, captured plate data may not be disclosed except pursuant to a valid warrant or court order. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5493 (request no. H05411'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.